Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 47 Motor Vehicle Reparations Act

31-47-1.
Short title and declaration of purpose.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Motor Vehicle Reparation Act.”

The legislature is concerned over the rising toll of motor vehicle accidents and the suffering and loss inflicted by them. The legislature has determined that it is a matter of grave concern that motorists shall be financially able to respond in damages for their negligent acts, so that innocent victims of motor vehicle accidents may be recompensed for the injury and financial loss inflicted upon them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1.

31-47-1.1.
Legislative findings and intent.

WHEREAS, the General Assembly has conducted extensive hearings on the issue of mandatory automobile insurance and finds that:

Mandatory automobile liability insurance will not guarantee that all drivers will carry automobile liability insurance and in other states with mandatory automobile insurance nearly twenty percent (20%) to twenty-five percent (25%) of drivers do not comply with the state mandate and drive without insurance;

Because of the evidence described in subdivision (1), Rhode Island drivers will need to carry additional insurance, to protect themselves from harm by uninsured motorists;

All presently uninsured drivers who try to acquire automobile insurance will be placed in the assigned risk pool regardless of a good driving record, at an excessive rate;

The state of Rhode Island ranks the eighth (8th) highest in the country for the cost of automobile insurance litigation per capita, this high cost of legal action adds to the already high cost of automobile insurance;

No-fault insurance can reduce the cost of automobile insurance by reducing litigation and right-to-sue, but evidence also indicates that no-fault insurance can increase the cost of insurance if not properly enacted;

A proposed rate increase in the Rhode Island Auto Insurance Plan of thirty-four percent (34%) has been granted without full disclosure by insurance companies of their investments, profits, losses, administrative costs and other pertinent information to justify the rate increase;

Fraud, theft and inflated automobile repair costs are significant elements of the increased cost of automobile insurance which must be reduced;

The Governor of the state has agreed to immediately institute a blue ribbon task force to investigate the causes for the high cost of automobile insurance, recommend remedies to reduce the cost of automobile insurance and prepare legislation for introduction. The scope of the task force shall include, but not be limited to, the reviewing of:

Procedures and processes concerning claims, appraisals, adjustments and auto repair charges,

Costs of litigation, including the imposition of ceiling or caps on legal fees,

Disclosure by insurance companies of all costs to do business, including those that affect premium rates,

Enforcement and restitution procedures.

The task force shall make specific recommendations to the general assembly pertaining to the alternatives of no-fault insurance, traditional liability and so-called “choice” legislation which provides an option of no-fault or traditional liability insurance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 431, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 46.

31-47-1.2.
Subpoena.

The governor shall have the right to grant subpoena powers, by executive order, to any commission or task force created to investigate the causes for the high cost of automobile insurance in Rhode Island, as referenced in §

31-47-1.1(8)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 431, § 1.

31-47-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter the term:

“Accident” or “motor vehicle accident” means any accident involving a motor vehicle that results in bodily injury to, or death of, any person, or damage to the property of any person in excess of five hundred dollars ($500).

“Administrator ” means the administrator of the division of motor vehicles in the department of revenue.

“Commissioner” means the insurance commissioner of this state.

“Dealer engaged in the business of leasing motor vehicles” means any person engaged in the business of regularly making available, offering to make available, or arranging for another person to use a motor vehicle pursuant to a bailment, lease, or other contractual arrangement.

“Driver” means every person who drives, or is in actual physical control of, a motor vehicle.

“Financial security bond” means for each motor vehicle a bond executed by the owner and by a surety company duly authorized to transact business in this state.

“Financial security deposit” means for each motor vehicle the deposit with the assistant director of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) in cash or securities, such as may legally be purchased by savings banks or trust funds, of a market value of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).

“License” includes any license, permit, or privilege to operate a motor vehicle issued under the laws of this state including:

Any temporary instruction permit or examiner’s driving permit;

The privilege of any person to drive a motor vehicle whether or not the person holds a valid license; or

Any nonresident’s operating privilege.

“Motor vehicle” means every vehicle required to display registration plates for operation upon public highways of this state.

“Nonresident” means every person who is not a resident of this state.

“Nonresident’s operating privilege” means the privilege conferred upon a nonresident by the laws of this state pertaining to the operation by that person of a motor vehicle, or the use of a motor vehicle owned by that person, in this state.

“Owner” means a person who holds the legal title of a motor vehicle. If a motor vehicle is the subject of an agreement for conditional sale or lease with the right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee, the vendee or lessee is the owner. If a mortgagor of a motor vehicle is entitled to possession, the mortgagor is the owner.

“Owner’s policy of liability insurance” means a policy:

Affording coverage as defined in the minimum provisions prescribed in a regulation that shall be promulgated by the commissioner. The commissioner, before promulgating the regulations or any amendments to them, shall consult with all insurers licensed to write automobile liability insurance in this state and shall not prescribe minimum provisions that fail to reflect the provisions of automobile liability insurance policies issued within this state at the date of the regulation or amendment of it. Nothing contained in regulation or in this chapter shall prohibit any insurer from affording coverage under an owner’s policy of liability insurance more liberal than that required by the minimum provisions. Every owner’s policy of liability insurance shall provide insurance subject to the regulation against loss from the liability imposed by law for damages, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to, or death of, any person and injury to, or destruction of, property arising out of the ownership, maintenance, use, or operation of a specific motor vehicle or motor vehicles within the state of Rhode Island or elsewhere in the United States, in North America, or the Dominion of Canada, subject to a limit, exclusive of interest and costs, with respect to each motor vehicle of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) because of bodily injury to, or death of, one person in any one accident; and subject to the limit for one person, to a limit of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), because of bodily injury to, or death of, two (2) or more persons in any one accident; and a limit of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) because of injury to, or destruction of, property of others in any one accident; or seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) combined, single limit. Any insurer authorized to issue an owner’s policy of liability insurance as provided for in this chapter may, pending the issue of the policy, make an agreement to be known as a binder, or may, in lieu of the policy, issue a renewal endorsement or evidence of renewal of an existing policy, each of which shall be construed to provide indemnity or protection in like manner and to the same extent as the policy. The provisions of this chapter shall apply to such binders, renewal endorsements, or evidences of renewal; and

In the case of a vehicle registered in this state, a policy issued by an insurer duly authorized to transact business in this state; or

In the case of a vehicle registered in another state in the name of a nonresident, either a policy issued by an authorized insurer, or a policy issued by an unauthorized insurer authorized to transact business in the state of the nonresident’s residence if the unauthorized insurer files with the commissioner, in a form to be approved by him or her, a statement consenting to service of process and declaring its policies shall be deemed to be varied to comply with the requirements of this chapter; and

The form of which has been approved by the commissioner.

No such policy shall be issued or delivered in this state until a copy of the form of the policy shall have been on file with the commissioner for at least thirty (30) days, unless sooner approved in writing by the commissioner, nor, if within that period of thirty (30) days, the commissioner shall have notified the carrier in writing that in the commissioner’s opinion specifying the reasons for it, the form of the policy does not comply with the laws of the state.

“Person” includes every natural person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation.

“Proof of financial security” means proof of ability to respond in damages for liability arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle as evidenced by an owner’s policy of liability insurance, a financial security bond, a financial security deposit, or qualification as a self-insurer under this title, or in the case of a nonresident, under self-insurance provisions of the laws of the jurisdiction of that nonresident. Proof of financial security may be produced in either paper or electronic format. Acceptable electronic formats include display of documentation on any mobile electronic device.

“Registration” means registration certificates and registration plates issued under the laws of this state pertaining to the registration of motor vehicles.

“Self insurer” means a person who shall have been determined by the department of business regulation, in accordance with this title, to be financially responsible.

“State,” when used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, means any state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or any province of the Dominion of Canada.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 46; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 29; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 29; P.L. 2014, ch. 29, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 36, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 51, § 1.

31-47-3.
Regulations authorized — Access to court and agency records.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized to promulgate reasonable regulations to provide effective administration and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of this or any other law of this state, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, shall have access to the records of the family court and all other courts and agencies concerning motor vehicle violations of any person who has applied for motor vehicle liability insurance. Upon request of the insurance company to which application has been made, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall make available to the insurance company any information concerning motor vehicle violations of the applicant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1.

31-47-3.1.
Registration application.

No motor vehicle shall be registered and no registration renewed in this state unless the application for the registration of a motor vehicle shall contain a statement to be signed by the applicant who does all of the following:

States that the applicant will not operate, or allow to be operated, the registered motor vehicle or any other motor vehicle unless all those motor vehicles shall be covered by financial security;

Contains a brief summary of the purposes and operation of this chapter, the rights and duties of the applicant and the penalties for violation of this chapter;

Warns the applicant that this chapter does not prevent the possibility that the applicant may be involved in an accident with an owner or operator of a motor vehicle who is without financial responsibility.

In the case of a person who purchases any motor vehicle from a licensed motor vehicle dealer, who agrees to make application for registration of the motor vehicle on behalf of the purchaser, the person shall sign a statement that complies with subsection (a) of this section.

In the case of a person who leases any motor vehicle from a dealer engaged in the business of leasing motor vehicles who agrees to make application for registration of the motor vehicle on behalf of the lessee, the person shall sign a statement that complies with subsection (a) of this section, and the dealer shall do either of the following:

Submit the statement signed by the person to the division of motor vehicles;

Sign and submit a statement that certifies that the statement has been signed and filed with the dealer or incorporated into the lease.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall prescribe the form for all statements required under this section and the manner in which these statements shall be presented to the applicant. Statements shall be designed to enable the applicant to retain a copy.

An application for an operator’s, chauffeur’s, restricted or probationary license, or renewal of those licenses shall contain a statement to be signed by the applicant that does all of the following:

States that the applicant will not operate a motor vehicle in this state, unless he or she maintains, or has maintained on his or her behalf, financial security;

Contains a brief summary of the purposes and operation of this chapter, the rights and duties of the applicant and the penalties for violation of this chapter;

Warns the applicant that the financial responsibility law does not prevent the possibility that the applicant may be involved in an accident with an owner or operator of a motor vehicle who is without financial security.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 431, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 1; ch. 142, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 46.

31-47-4.
Notice of termination.

No contract of insurance or renewal of it shall be terminated by cancellation or failure to renew by the insurer until at least thirty (30) days after mailing to the named insured, at the address shown on the policy a notice of termination or cancellation by certificate of mailing, except that when cancellation is for nonpayment of premium the notice shall be mailed to the named insured at the address shown on the policy at least ten (10) days prior to the effective date of cancellation.

Time of the effective date and hour of termination stated in the notice shall become the end of the policy period.

Every notice of termination for any cause whatsoever sent to the insured shall include in type of which the face shall not be smaller than twelve (12) point, a statement that financial security is required to be maintained continuously throughout the registration period and that failure to maintain financial security shall subject the violator to a mandatory suspension of license and registration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 181, § 1.

31-47-5.
Acceptance of financial security deposits.

All moneys or securities delivered to the assistant director as a financial security deposit shall be placed by the assistant director in the custody of the general treasurer. These assets shall be subject to execution to satisfy any judgment for damages for bodily injury or death, or injury to or destruction of property arising out of the ownership, maintenance, use, or operation of the motor vehicle with respect to which the deposit has been accepted. This deposit is subject to the same limits on amount required by this chapter for an owner’s policy of liability insurance, and if the moneys or securities shall be otherwise subjected to attachment or any execution, the depositor shall immediately furnish additional moneys or securities not otherwise subject to attachment or execution to meet the requirements of this chapter.

The assistant director shall not accept moneys or securities as a financial security deposit unless accompanied by evidence that there are no unsatisfied judgments against the person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1.

31-47-6.
Release of financial security bonds or deposits.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles, upon the surrender of the registration and number plates for a motor vehicle for which a financial security bond or deposit was accepted by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, shall permit the cancellation of any bond or shall direct that any deposit be returned by the general treasurer. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall not release the bond or deposit in the event any action for damages upon a liability referred to in this chapter is then pending, or any judgment upon any liability then outstanding and unsatisfied, or in the event the administrator of the division of motor vehicles has received notice that the person has within the period of three (3) months immediately preceding been involved as a driver in any motor vehicle accident. An affidavit of the applicant of nonexistence of those facts shall be sufficient evidence of it in the absence of evidence to the contrary in the records of the division of motor vehicles.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles, subject to any reasonable regulations that he or she may establish, shall permit the form of financial security acceptable under this chapter to be substituted for another form of financial security which may already have been accepted by the assistant director as complies with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1.

31-47-7.
Self-insurers.

The director of the department of business regulation, in his or her discretion, may upon the application of a person having registered in his or her name in this state more than twenty-five (25) motor vehicles, issue a certificate of self insurance when he or she is reasonably satisfied that the person is possessed, and will continue to be possessed, of financial ability to respond to judgments obtained against the person arising out of the ownership, maintenance, use, or operation of the person’s motor vehicles. Entities applying to, or previously authorized to, permissibly self-insure are subject to the jurisdiction of the department of business regulation. Upon due notice and hearing, the director of the department of business regulation may, in his or her discretion and upon reasonable grounds, cancel a certificate of self insurance. The department of business regulation is authorized to promulgate and enforce rules and regulations that may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section, including, but not limited to:

Obtaining and reviewing financial statements and related information necessary to ascertain the applicant’s ability to self-insure,

Apportioning the cost of review to the applicant in a manner similar to that utilized to charge insurance companies for review and analysis of their financial statements, and

Imposing and enforcing upon entities authorized to permissibly self-insure any and all claims handling and settlement practices required of insurers in the settlement of claims.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 29, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 36, § 3.

31-47-8.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 440, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 2, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 2, effective July 14, 2021.

31-47-8.1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 378, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 75; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 75; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 29; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 29; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 2, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 2, effective July 14, 2021.

31-47-9.
Penalties.

Any owner of a motor vehicle registered or required to be registered in this state who shall knowingly operate the motor vehicle or knowingly permit it to be operated in this state without having in full force and effect the financial security required by the provisions of this chapter, and any other person who shall operate in this state any motor vehicle registered or required to be registered in this state with the knowledge that the owner of it does not have in full force and effect financial security, except a person who, at the time of operation of the motor vehicle, had in effect an operator’s policy of liability insurance with respect to his or her operation of the vehicle, may be subject to a mandatory suspension of license and registration as follows:

For a first offense, a suspension of up to three (3) months and may be fined one hundred dollars ($100) up to five hundred dollars ($500);

For a second offense, a suspension of six (6) months and may be fined five hundred dollars ($500); and

For a third and subsequent offense, a suspension of up to one year. Additionally, any person violating this section a third or subsequent time shall be punished as a civil violation and may be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000).

An order of suspension and impoundment of a license or registration, or both, shall state that date on or before which the person is required to surrender the person’s license or certificate of registration and registration plates. The person is deemed to have surrendered the license or certificate of registration and registration plates, in compliance with the order, if the person does either of the following:

On or before the date specified in the order, personally delivers the license or certificate of registration and registration plates, or causes the delivery of those items, to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles or court, whichever issued the order; or

Mails the license or certificate of registration and registration plates to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, in an envelope or container bearing a postmark showing a date no later than the date specified in the order.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall not restore any operating privileges or registration rights suspended under this section or return any license, certificate of registration, or registration plates impounded under this section unless the rights are not subject to suspension or revocation under any other law and unless the person, in addition to complying with all other conditions required by law for reinstatement of operating privileges or registration rights, complies with all of the following:

Pays a reinstatement fee of thirty dollars ($30.00). The reinstatement fee may be increased, upon approval of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, up to an amount not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00); and

Files and maintains proof of financial security. To facilitate the administration of this chapter the clerk of the courts shall notify the administrator of the division of motor vehicles of all persons against whom judgments have been entered arising out of a motor vehicle collision.

For the purpose of this section, an “operator’s policy of liability insurance” means a policy issued by an insurance carrier duly authorized to transact business in this state that shall insure the person named in it as insured, against loss from the liability imposed upon him or her by law for damages, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person and injury to or destruction of property arising out of the use by him or her of any motor vehicle not owned by him or her, subject to the same minimum provisions and approval required by this chapter with respect to an owner’s policy of liability insurance. With respect to a nonresident, the policy may also be issued by a nonadmitted insurance carrier provided the requirements of this chapter, with respect to issuance of an owner’s policy of liability insurance by the carrier, have been met.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 142, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 476, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 7, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 7, effective July 14, 2021.

31-47-9.1.
Penalties — Illegal evidence of financial security.

No person shall knowingly make, sell or otherwise make available any invalid or counterfeit evidence of financial security as defined in this chapter. No person shall alter any invalid evidence of financial security to make it appear valid.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500), nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or imprisonment of not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 379, § 1.

31-47-10.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 158, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 2, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 2, effective July 14, 2021.

31-47-11.
Reinstatement of suspended license or registration.

Any order of suspension or impoundment issued under this chapter may be terminated at any time if the administrator of the division of motor vehicles determines upon a showing of proof of financial security that the operator or owner of the motor vehicle was in compliance with financial security requirements of this chapter at the time of the traffic offense or accident which resulted in the order against the person. That determination may be made without a hearing. This section does not apply unless the person shows good cause for the person’s failure to present satisfactory proof of financial responsibility to the court, traffic tribunal, or administrator of the division of motor vehicles prior to the issuance of the order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1.

31-47-12.
Police officers and agents of administrator of the division of motor vehicles — Fees collected, forms of proof.

For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter, every police officer of a state, town, or municipality is deemed an agent of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. Any police officer who, in the performance of his or her duties as authorized by law, becomes aware of a person whose license is under an order of suspension, or whose certificate of registration and registration plates are under an order of impoundment, pursuant to this section may confiscate the license, certificate of registration, and registration plates, and return them to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. Any forms used by law enforcement agencies in administering this section shall be prescribed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, the cost of which shall be borne by these agencies. No police officer, law enforcement agency employing a police officer, or political subdivision or governmental agency that employs a police officer shall be liable in a civil action for damages or loss to persons arising out of the performance of the duty required or authorized by this section. “Police officer” means the full-time police from the rank of patrol up to and including the rank of colonel or chief of any police department in any city or town within the state of Rhode Island or of the state police.

All fees, except court costs, collected under this chapter shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the highway safety fund in a special account hereby created, to be known as the “financial responsibility compliance special account.” This special account shall be used exclusively to cover costs incurred by the division of motor vehicles in the administration of this chapter, and by any law enforcement agency employing any police officer who returns any license, certificate of registration, and registration plates to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles pursuant to this chapter.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles, court, or traffic tribunal may require proof of financial security. A person may demonstrate proof of financial responsibility under this section by presenting to the court, traffic tribunal, or administrator of the division of motor vehicles any of the following documents or a copy of these documents:

A certificate of proof of financial responsibility;

A bond or certification of the issuance of a bond;

A certificate of deposit of money or securities; or

A certificate of self insurance.

At the time of investigation of a motor vehicle offense or accident by a police officer or when a motor vehicle is stopped by a police officer for probable cause, the police officer making the investigation or stopping the motor vehicle shall ask for evidence of proof of financial security as defined in this chapter. Proof of financial responsibility may be provided using a mobile electronic device; provided, however, that the police officer requiring the proof of financial responsibility shall be prohibited from viewing any other content on the mobile electronic device. Any person utilizing an electronic device to provide proof of insurance shall assume any and all liability for any damage sustained to the mobile electronic device. If the evidence is not provided, a citation to appear before the traffic tribunal shall be issued to the operator. However, any citation issued solely for failing to provide evidence of financial responsibility shall be held by the issuing police officer or law enforcement agency for at least one business day before submitting the citation to the traffic tribunal. Any operator who receives a citation for failing to provide valid evidence of financial responsibility shall have the opportunity to provide evidence of financial responsibility that existed at the time of the violation within the one-business-day period, at which time the issuing police officer or law enforcement agency shall withdraw the citation, and the motorist shall not be required to appear before the traffic tribunal. Notwithstanding this provision, police officers who issue a citation for lack of evidence of financial responsibility, in addition to one or more other citations, need not wait the one-business-day waiting period before submitting the citation for lack of evidence of financial responsibility to the traffic tribunal. The traffic tribunal may, by rule and regulation, prescribe the procedures for processing the citations. Motor vehicles may not be stopped solely for the purpose of checking for evidence of proof of financial security.

Upon a first offense, one must provide proof of current insurance and a binder or release letter covering the cost of the accident, as long as the accident does not include bodily injury or death.

In addition, penalties do not release the motorist from any pending matter before any other appropriate court.

Any operator of a motor vehicle registered in this state who shall operate a motor vehicle without proof of financial security, as defined in this chapter, being in full force and effect on the date of the motor vehicle stop or accident, may be subject to suspension of license and fines as follows:

For a first offense, a suspension of up to thirty (30) days and may be fined one hundred dollars ($100) up to two hundred and fifty dollars ($250);

For a second offense, a suspension of up to six (6) months and may be fined five hundred dollars ($500); and

For a third and subsequent offense, a suspension of up to one year. Additionally, any person violating this section a third or subsequent time shall be punished as a civil violation and may be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 476, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 498, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 513, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 24, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 308, art. 2, § 10.

31-47-12.1.
Right to choose auto body repair facility.

Any evidence of proof of financial responsibility or security shall include the following statement therein in bold face print:

“PURSUANT TO RHODE ISLAND LAW, THE CONSUMER HAS THE RIGHT TO CHOOSE THE REPAIR FACILITY TO COMPLETE REPAIRS TO A MOTOR VEHICLE. AN INSURANCE COMPANY MAY NOT INTERFERE WITH THE CONSUMER’S CHOICE OF REPAIRER.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 526, § 2.

31-47-13.
Insurers and sureties.

A finding by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles or traffic tribunal, or court that a person is covered by financial responsibility in the form of an insurance policy or surety bond is not binding upon the named insurer or surety or any of its officers, employees, agents, or representatives and has no legal effect except for the purpose of administering this section.

The preparation and delivery of a document authorized to be used as financial responsibility under this division does not do any of the following:

Create any liability or estoppel against an insurer or surety, or any of its officers, employees, agents, or representatives;

Constitute an admission of the existence of, or of any liability or coverage under, any policy or bond;

Waive any defenses or counterclaims available to an insurer, surety, agent, employee, or representative in an action commenced by an insured or third party claimant upon a cause of action alleged to have arisen under an insurance policy or surety bond or by reason of the preparation and delivery of a document for use as financial responsibility.

Whenever it is determined by a final judgment in a judicial proceeding that an insurer or surety, which has been named on a document accepted by a court or the administrator of the division of motor vehicles as financial responsibility covering the operation of a motor vehicle at the time of an accident or offense, is not liable to pay a judgment for injuries or damages resulting from that operation, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall, notwithstanding any previous contrary finding, immediately suspend the operating privileges and registration rights of the person against whom the judgment was rendered as provided by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1.

31-47-14.
Notice to other jurisdictions.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall transmit a certified copy of any record of any conviction under this chapter or of any action taken pursuant to this chapter resulting in revocation of a nonresident’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state or the privilege of the operation within this state of any motor vehicle owned by the nonresident to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles or officer performing similar functions in the state in which the nonresident resides.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1.

31-47-15.
Exceptions.

This chapter shall not apply to any motor vehicle for the operation of which security or proof of financial responsibility is required to be furnished under §§

39-14-18

,

39-14-19

,

39-13-7

, 39-13-8, and

39-13-9

, nor to any vehicle for which a permit or certificate is in force pursuant to the Interstate Commerce Act (see now 49 U.S.C. § 10101 et seq.), nor to any motor vehicle owned by the United States, any state, or any political subdivision of any state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1.

31-47-15.1.
Exception for seasonal vehicles.

Upon receipt of a signed written request for a suspension from the owner of a registered motor vehicle stating that the vehicle will not be operated upon any highway during a period of not less than thirty (30) consecutive days, the insurer of the vehicle shall suspend, to the extent requested by the owner, insurance afforded under the policy providing the security required by this chapter, for the vehicle until notified by the owner that the coverage should be reinstated. During the period of suspension only, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply with respect to the vehicle. If the vehicle is operated upon any highway by or with the permission of the owner during the period of suspension, the provisions of this chapter shall immediately become applicable.

As used in this section, the term “highway” includes all roads as defined in §

31-1-23

, except a private road or driveway.

This section shall not apply to a motor vehicle for which proof of financial responsibility is required under the provisions of chapter 32 of this title. This section shall not apply to motorized vehicles used seasonally in the town of New Shoreham commonly referred to as mopeds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 7, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 7, effective July 14, 2021.

31-47-15.2.
Exception — Vehicles owned by active duty military personnel.

“Highway,” as used in this section, means all roads as defined in §

31-1-23

, except a private road or driveway.

Upon receipt of a signed written request for a suspension from the owner of a registered motor vehicle stating that the vehicle will not be operated upon any highway during a period of not less than thirty (30) consecutive days as a consequence of the entrance of the owner into the active duty military service of the United States, the insurer of that vehicle shall suspend, to the extent requested by the owner, insurance afforded under the policy providing the security required by this chapter for that vehicle until notified by the owner that the coverage should be reinstated. During the period of suspension only, the provisions of this chapter do not apply as to that vehicle. If the vehicle is operated upon any highway by or with the permission of the owner during the period of suspension, the provisions of this chapter immediately become applicable. Reinstatement of coverage shall be under the same terms and conditions as were in effect at the time of notification of suspension.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 256, § 1.